Washington statutes.
RCW 9.66.030

Maintaining or permitting nuisance.

Every person who shall commit or maintain a public nuisance, for which no special punishment is prescribed; or who shall wilfully omit or refuse to perform any legal duty relating to the removal of such nuisance; and every person who shall let, or permit to be used, any building or boat, or portion thereof, knowing that it is intended to be, or is being used, for committing or maintaining any such nuisance, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 250; Code 1881 s 1248; 1875 p 81 s 14; RRS s 2502.]